Maryland, session 2026, SB0726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–132.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE
AVAILABLE A CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSE ON EDUCATOR
WELL–BEING AND FLOURISHING.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO ALL SCHOOL
PERSONNEL AND ADMINISTRATORS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0726*

SENATE BILL 726
(3) THE COURSE MAY BE MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH SYNCHRONOUS
OR ASYNCHRONOUS INSTRUCTION.
(4) TO FULFILL THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) DEVELOP A COURSE;
(II) ADAPT AN EXISTING COURSE DEVELOPED BY A THIRD
PARTY; OR
(III) MAKE AVAILABLE AN EXISTING COURSE DEVELOPED BY A
THIRD PARTY.
(B) THE COURSE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE AT A
COMPARABLE RATE TO CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSES FOR
LICENSED PERSONNEL THAT CONTAIN THE SAME NUMBER OF PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT POINTS.
(C) (1) THE COURSE MADE AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL CONSIST OF INSTRUCTION ON UNDERSTANDING THE EIGHT
DIMENSIONS OF WELL–BEING IDENTIFIED BY THE FEDERAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ADMINISTRATION AND APPLYING THOSE LESSONS TO
INCREASING THE EDUCATOR’S PERSONAL WELL–BEING.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(I) SOCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
DIFFERENT TYPES OF RELATIONSHIPS AND BUILDING FRIENDSHIPS AND A SENSE
OF BELONGING AND COMMUNITY;
(II) ENVIRONMENTAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING:
1. THE IMPORTANCE OF A CONNECTION TO NATURE AND
THE OUTDOORS; AND
2. THE IMPORTANCE OF FEELING SAFE TO AN
EDUCATOR’S OVERALL WELL–BEING;
(III) PHYSICAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF A
HEALTHY BODY TO OVERALL WELL–BEING;

SENATE BILL 726 3
(IV) EMOTIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE
OF BEING ABLE TO EXPRESS FEELINGS, ADJUST TO EMOTIONAL CHALLENGES, COPE
WITH LIFE’S STRESSORS, AND ENJOY LIFE;
(V) SPIRITUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
A SENSE OF MEANING, PURPOSE, AND CHARACTER;
(VI) OCCUPATIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF WORK TO AN INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL WELL–BEING;
(VII) INTELLECTUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF BEING ABLE TO KEEP AN ACTIVE BRAIN, CULTIVATE PERSONAL
INTERESTS, AND PURSUE LIFELONG LEARNING; AND
(VIII) FINANCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
UNDERSTANDING FINANCIAL PROCESSES AND FINANCIAL RESOURCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.